North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 5. Maternal and Child Health and Women’s Health.

Part 1. In General.

§ 130A-124.
Department to establish maternal and child health program.

The Department shall establish and administer a maternal and child health program for the delivery of preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic and habilitative health services to women of childbearing years, children and other persons who require these services.
The program may include, but shall not be limited to, providing professional education and consultation, community coordination and direct care and counseling.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

Prior year refunds received by the Children’s Special Health Services Program that are not encumbered or spent during a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the Department for purchase of care and contracts in the Program.
Funds appropriated for the purchase of care and contracts in the Program that are encumbered and not spent during a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the Department for the purchase of care and
contracts in the Program.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 275(a); 1997-172, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 54.

Expansion of the Continuum of Care Pilot Program into a Statewide Program.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.6, provides: “(a) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of three million two hundred thousand dollars ($3,200,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2021-2022 fiscal year and the sum of three million two hundred thousand dollars ($3,200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2022-2023 fiscal year shall be allocated to the Human Coalition, a nonprofit organization, as provided in
subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be used for nonreligious, nonsectarian purposes only.

“(b) The Human Coalition shall use funds allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to expand the continuum of care pilot program authorized by Section 11E.13(b) of S.L. 2017-57 into a statewide program. The purpose of the statewide continuum
of care program includes expansion and operation of the Human Coalition Pregnancy Support Program to provide community outreach, consultations, and support and care coordination for women experiencing under-supported pregnancies. The
program is designed to (i) encourage healthy childbirth, (ii) support childbirth as an alternative to abortion, (iii) promote family formation, (iv) assist in establishing successful parenting techniques, and (v) increase the economic
self-sufficiency of families. The continuum of care program shall consist of existing locations of the pilot program authorized by Section 11E.13(b) of S.L. 2017-57 and other locations around the State to be determined by the Human
Coalition. All providers rendering services under the program for which they are compensated with funds allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be physically located in the State of North Carolina. The continuum
of care program shall provide direct services, supports, social services case management, and referrals to biological parents of unborn children and biological or adoptive parents of children under the age of 2 and shall consist of
at least all of the following components:

“(1) Outreach to at-risk populations eligible for the program.

“(2) The use of licensed nurses to perform the following functions:

“a. Assessment and evaluation of needs related to pregnancy or parenting.

“b. Provision of medically accurate, pregnancy-related medical information to program participants.

“(3) The use of licensed social workers, or other individuals of equivalent experience, to perform the following functions:

“a. Development of a care plan, resources, and supports for program participants to address identified needs.

“b. Referrals to appropriate local resources, including State and federal benefits programs and local charitable organizations.

“c. Assistance in applying for State and federal benefits programs.

“d. Assistance in accomplishing elements of the care plan.

“(c) In order to be eligible to receive services under the continuum of care program, an individual shall, at the time of initial contact with the program, be (i) a resident of North Carolina and (ii) a biological parent of an unborn child or a biological
or adoptive parent of a child under the age of 2. Participants of the original pilot program authorized under Section 11E.13(b) of S.L. 2017-57, who terminated a pregnancy prior to birth, are eligible to continue to receive continuum
of care program services for a period of six months from the date of termination of pregnancy.

“(d) The Human Coalition may use up to ten percent (10%) of the funds allocated for each year of the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium for administrative purposes.

“(e) By December 1, 2021, and every six months thereafter, the Human Coalition shall report to the Department of Health and Human Services on the status and operation of the continuum of care program authorized by subsection (b) of this section. The report
shall include at least all of the following:

“(1) A detailed breakdown of expenditures for the program.

“(2) The number of individuals served by the program, and for the individuals served, the types of services provided to each.

“(3) Any other information requested by the Department of Health and Human Services as necessary for evaluating the success of the program.

“(f) By April 1, 2023, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the status and operation of the continuum of care program.”

§ 130A-125.
Screening of newborns for metabolic and other hereditary and congenital disorders.

The Department shall establish and administer a Newborn Screening Program. The program shall include, but shall not be limited to:

Development and distribution of educational materials regarding the availability and benefits of newborn screening.

Provision of laboratory testing.

Development of follow-up protocols to assure early treatment for identified children, and the provision of genetic counseling and support services for the families of identified children.

Provision of necessary dietary treatment products or medications for identified children as medically indicated and when not otherwise available.

For each newborn, provision of physiological screening in each ear for the presence of permanent hearing loss.

For each newborn, provision of pulse oximetry screening to detect congenital heart defects.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement the Newborn Screening Program. The rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, the conditions for which screening is required. The Commission shall amend the rules as necessary to ensure that
each condition listed on the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel developed by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the Advisory Committee on Heritable Disorders of Newborns and Children
(the RUSP) is included in the Newborn Screening Program within three years after being added to the RUSP, except that the Commission is exempt from rule making with respect to adding screening tests for Pompe disease, Mucopolysaccharidosis
Type I (MPS I), and X-Linked Adrenoleukodystrophy (X-ALD). The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services 18 months after a condition
is added to the RUSP. When a delay adding an RUSP-identified condition to the Newborn Screening Program exceeds three years, the Department shall provide a report on the status and reasons for the delay to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services every six months following the three-year delay.Screening is not required when the parents or the guardian of the infant object to such screening. If the parents or guardian object
to the screening, the objection shall be presented in writing to the physician or other person responsible for administering the test, who shall place the written objection in the infant’s medical record.

(b1) The Commission shall adopt temporary and permanent rules to include newborn hearing screening and pulse oximetry screening in the Newborn Screening Program established under this section.

(b2) The Commission’s rules for pulse oximetry screening shall address at least all of the following:

Follow-up protocols to ensure early treatment for newborn infants diagnosed with a congenital heart defect, including by means of telemedicine. As used in this subsection, “telemedicine” is the use of audio and video between places of lesser and greater
medical capability or expertise to provide and support health care when distance separates participants who are in different geographical locations.

A system for tracking both the process and outcomes of newborn screening utilizing pulse oximetry, with linkage to the Birth Defects Monitoring Program established pursuant to

G.S. 130A-131.16

.

A fee of one hundred twenty-eight dollars ($128.00) applies to a laboratory test performed by the State Laboratory of Public Health pursuant to this section. The fee for a laboratory test is a departmental receipt of the Department and shall be used to
offset the cost of the Newborn Screening Program. The Commission may by rule, and in consultation with the Secretary, increase this fee by no more than the amount necessary to offset the cost of incorporating a condition listed
on the RUSP into the Newborn Screening Program. The Commission shall by rule decrease this fee when it determines, in consultation with the Secretary, that current and anticipated fee receipts will exceed current and anticipated
recurring operating costs of the Newborn Screening Program by more than ten percent (10%).

The Newborn Screening Equipment Replacement and Acquisition Fund (Fund) is established as a nonreverting fund within the Department. Thirty-one dollars ($31.00) of each fee collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be credited to this
Fund and applied to the Newborn Screening Program to be used as directed in this subsection. The Department shall not use monies in this Fund for any purpose other than to purchase or replace laboratory instruments, equipment,
and information technology systems used in the Newborn Screening Program. The Department shall notify and consult with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations whenever the balance in the Fund exceeds the following
threshold: the sum of (i) the actual cost of new equipment necessary to incorporate conditions listed on the RUSP into the Newborn Screening Program and (ii) one hundred percent (100%) of the replacement value of existing equipment
used in the Newborn Screening Program. Any monies in the Fund in excess of this threshold shall be available for expenditure only upon an act of appropriation by the General Assembly.

Annually on March 1, the Department shall report to the House Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the Newborn Screening Program. The
report shall include all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year:

A description of the services funded by the Newborn Screening Program, including a description of the Department’s activities with respect to each of the services listed in subsection (a) of this section.

A detailed budget and list of expenditures for the Newborn Screening Program, including all positions funded.

Fees and other receipts collected for the Newborn Screening Program.

Projected fees and other receipts for the Newborn Screening Program for the current and upcoming fiscal year.

Any condition the Department anticipates will be listed on the RUSP within the current or upcoming fiscal year and a description of the following:

Any laboratory instruments or equipment the Department will need to purchase in order to perform screening for that condition.

Any additional positions the Department will need to establish in order to perform screening for that condition.

The balance in the Newborn Screening Equipment Replacement and Acquisition Fund as of the preceding June 30.

Amounts credited to the Fund.

Amounts expended from the Fund and the purposes of the expenditures.

Proposed expenditures of the monies in the Fund for the current and upcoming fiscal year.

Any other information the Department deems relevant to maintaining the Newborn Screening Program as a fee-supported program.

History.
1991, c. 661, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 6; 1998-131, s. 13; 2000-67, s. 11.31(a); 2005-276, s. 41.1(a); 2007-182, s. 2; 2008-107, s. 29.4(a); 2013-45, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 12E.12(a); 2016-94, s. 12E.5(a);
2018-5, s. 11E.1(a); 2021-180, s. 9G.6A(a).

§ 130A-126.
Rule-making authority for birth — three-year-old early intervention program.

The rule-making authority for the birth — three-year-old early intervention program through Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities Act (IDEA) is transferred from the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services
to the Commission for Public Health.

History.
2005-276, s. 10.54A; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services.”

Part 2. Perinatal Health Care.

§ 130A-127.
Department to establish program.

The Department shall establish and administer a perinatal health care program. The program may include, but shall not be limited to:

Prenatal health care services including health education and identification of high-risk pregnancies;

Prenatal, delivery and newborn health care services provided at hospitals participating at graduated levels of complexity; and

Regionalized perinatal health care services including a plan for effective communication, consultation, referral and transportation links among hospitals, health departments, physicians, schools and other relevant community resources for mothers and infants
at high risk for mortality and morbidity.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1973, c. 1240, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-128.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 518, s. 1.

§ 130A-128A.

Recodified as G. S. 130A-128.1 by Session Laws 2009-570, s. 43.1, effective August 28, 2009.

§ 130A-128.1.
Department to provide free educational information about umbilical cord stem cells and umbilical cord blood banking.

As used in this section:

Health care professional. — A person who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 90 of the General Statutes to practice as a physician, physician assistant, or registered nurse or who is approved pursuant to Chapter 90 of the General Statutes to practice midwifery.

Umbilical cord blood. — The blood that remains in the umbilical cord and placenta after the birth of a newborn child.

Effective January 1, 2010, the Department of Health and Human Services shall make available free of charge to the general public on its Internet Web site printable publications, in a format that can be downloaded, containing medically accurate information
regarding umbilical cord stem cells and umbilical cord blood banking that is sufficient to allow a pregnant woman to make an informed decision about whether to participate in a public or private umbilical cord blood banking program.
The publications shall include at least all of the following information:

An explanation of the medical processes involved in the collection of umbilical cord blood.

An explanation of any risks associated with umbilical cord blood collection to the mother and the newborn child.

The options available to a mother regarding stem cells contained in the umbilical cord blood after delivery of the mother’s newborn child, including:

Having the stem cells discarded.

Donating the stem cells to a public umbilical cord blood bank.

Storing the stem cells in a private umbilical cord blood bank for use by immediate and extended family members.

Storing the stem cells for use by the family through a family or sibling donor banking program that provides free collection, processing, and storage of the stem cells where there is a medical need.

The current and potential future medical uses, risks, and benefits of umbilical cord blood collection to (i) the mother, newborn child, and biological family and (ii) individuals who are not biologically related to the mother or newborn child.

An explanation of the differences between public and private umbilical cord blood banking.

Options for ownership and future use of the donated umbilical cord blood.

The Department may satisfy the requirements of subsection (b) of this section by including on its Internet Web site a link to a federally sponsored Internet Web site that North Carolina citizens may access so long as the federally sponsored Internet Web
site contains all of the information specified in subdivisions (1) through (6) of subsection (b) of this section.

The Department shall encourage health care professionals who provide health care services that are directly related to a woman’s pregnancy to provide each woman with the publications described in subsection (b) of this section prior to the woman’s third
trimester of pregnancy.

A health care professional or health care institution shall not be liable for damages in a civil action, subject to prosecution in a criminal proceeding, or subject to disciplinary action by the North Carolina Medical Board or the North Carolina Board
of Nursing for acting in good faith with respect to informing a pregnant woman prior to her third trimester of pregnancy about the publications described in subsection (b) of this section.

History.
2009-67, s. 1; 2009-570, s. 43.1.

§ 130A-129.
Department to establish program.

The Department shall establish and administer a Sickle Cell Program. The Commission shall, after consultation with the Council on Sickle Cell Syndrome, adopt rules for the program that shall include, but not be limited to, programs for education, voluntary
testing, counseling, and medical reimbursement services for sickle cell syndrome. “Sickle cell syndrome” includes sickle cell disease, sickle cell trait, sickle cell thalassemia and variants.

History.
1987, c. 822, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Can You Hear Me?: How Implicit Bias Creates a Disparate Impact in Maternal Healthcare for Black Women,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 243 (2021).

§ 130A-130.
Duties of local health departments.

Local health departments shall provide sickle cell syndrome testing and counseling at no cost to persons requesting these services. If an individual is found to have any aspect of sickle cell syndrome, the local health department shall inform the individual
to that effect. The State Laboratory of Public Health shall, upon request, provide a person’s sickle cell screening test results to any local health department or Sickle Cell Program contracting agency which has been requested to provide
sickle cell services to that person.

History.
1987, c. 822, s. 2.

Part 3A. Council on Sickle Cell Syndrome.

§ 130A-131.
Council on Sickle Cell Syndrome; appointment; expenses; terms.

A Council on Sickle Cell Syndrome is created. The Council shall consist of a chairperson and 14 other members appointed by the Governor. Members shall serve without compensation except for reimbursement for travel and expenses in pursuit of Council business.
Except as provided in this subsection, Council members shall serve a term of three years. To achieve a staggered term structure, five members shall be appointed for a term of one year, five members for a term of two years, and five
members for a term of three years.

History.
1973, c. 570, s. 1; 1987, c. 822, s. 3; 1989, c. 727, s. 179.

§ 130A-131.1.
Council membership.

In making appointments, consideration shall be given to persons representing the following areas:

Members of community agencies interested in sickle cell syndrome;

State and local officials concerned with public health, social services and rehabilitation;

Teachers and members of State and local school boards;

Physicians in medical centers and physicians in community practice who are interested in sickle cell syndrome; [and]

Persons or relatives of persons with sickle cell disease.

History.
1973, c. 570, s. 2; 1987, c. 822, s. 3; 1989, c. 727, s. 179.

§ 130A-131.2.
Council role.

The Council shall advise the Department and the Commission for Public Health on the needs of persons with sickle cell syndrome, and shall make recommendations to meet these needs. Such recommendations shall include but not be limited to recommendations
for legislative action and for rules regarding the services of the Sickle Cell Program. The Council shall develop procedures to facilitate its operation. All clerical and other services required by the Council shall be furnished by
the Department without budget limitations.

History.
1973, c. 570, s. 3; 1987, c. 822, s. 3; 1989, c. 727, ss. 179, 180; 1997-443, s. 11A.76; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in the first sentence.

§§ 130A-131.3,
130A-131.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Lead Poisoning in Children.

§ 130A-131.5.
Commission to adopt rules.

For the protection of the public health, the Commission shall adopt rules for the prevention and control of lead poisoning in children in accordance with this Part.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-209, s. 1, effective October 30, 1998.

History.
1989, c. 333; c. 751, s. 15; 1991, c. 300, s. 1; 1997-506, s. 45; 1998-209, s. 1.

§ 130A-131.6.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-131.7.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

“Abatement” means undertaking any of the following measures to eliminate a lead-based paint hazard:

Removing lead-based paint from a surface and repainting the surface.

Removing a component, such as a windowsill, painted with lead-based paint and replacing the component.

Enclosing a surface painted with lead-based paint with paneling, vinyl siding, or another approved material.

Encapsulating a surface painted with lead-based paint with a sealant.

Any other measure approved by the Commission.

“Child-occupied facility” means a building, or portion of a building, constructed before 1978, regularly visited by a child who is less than six years of age. Child-occupied facilities may include, but are not limited to, child care facilities, preschools,
nurseries, kindergarten classrooms, schools, clinics, or treatment centers including the common areas, the grounds, any outbuildings, or other structures appurtenant to the facility.

“Confirmed lead poisoning” means a blood lead concentration of 10 micrograms per deciliter or greater determined by the lower of two consecutive blood tests within a 12-month period.

“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality or its authorized agent.

“Elevated blood lead level” means a blood lead concentration of five micrograms per deciliter or greater determined by the lower of two consecutive blood tests within a 12-month period.

“Lead-based paint hazard” means a condition that is likely to result in exposure to lead-based paint or to soil or dust that contains lead at a concentration that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard.

“Lead poisoning hazard” means any of the following:

Any lead-based paint or other substance that contains lead in an amount equal to or greater than 1.0 milligrams lead per square centimeter as determined by X-ray fluorescence or five-tenths of a percent (0.5%) lead by weight as determined by chemical
analysis: (i) on any readily accessible substance or chewable surface on which there is evidence of teeth marks or mouthing; or (ii) on any other deteriorated or otherwise damaged interior or exterior surface.

Any substance that contains lead intended for use by children less than six years of age in an amount equal to or greater than 0.06 percent (0.06%) lead by weight as determined by chemical analysis.

Any concentration of lead dust that is equal to or greater than 40 micrograms per square foot on floors or 250 micrograms per square foot on interior windowsills, vinyl miniblinds, bathtubs, kitchen sinks, or lavatories.

Any lead-based paint or other substance that contains lead on a friction or impact surface that is subject to abrasion, rubbing, binding, or damage by repeated contact and where the lead dust concentrations on the nearest horizontal surface underneath
the friction or impact surface are equal to or greater than 40 micrograms per square foot on floors or 250 micrograms per square foot on interior windowsills.

Any concentration of lead in bare soil in play areas, gardens, pet sleeping areas, and areas within three feet of a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility equal to or greater than 400 parts per million. Any concentration of lead in bare soil
in other locations of the yard equal to or greater than 1,200 parts per million.

Any ceramic ware generating equal to or greater than three micrograms of lead per milliliter of leaching solution for flatware or 0.5 micrograms of lead per milliliter for cups, mugs, and pitchers as determined by Method 973.32 of the Association of Official
Analytical Chemists.

Any concentration of lead in drinking water equal to or greater than 15 parts per billion.

“Lead-safe housing” is housing that was built since 1978 or has been tested by a person that has been certified to perform risk assessments and found to have no lead-based paint hazard within the meaning of the Residential Lead-Based Paint Reduction Act
of 1992, 42 U.S.C. § 4851b(15).

“Maintenance standard” means the following:

Using safe work practices, repairing and repainting areas of deteriorated paint inside a residential housing unit and for single-family and duplex residential dwelling built before 1950, repairing and repainting areas of deteriorated paint on interior
and exterior surfaces;

Cleaning the interior of the unit to remove dust that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard;

Adjusting doors and windows to minimize friction or impact on surfaces;

Subject to the occupant’s approval, appropriately cleaning any carpets;

Taking such steps as are necessary to ensure that all interior surfaces on which dust might collect are readily cleanable; and

Providing the occupant or occupants all information required to be provided under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction Act of 1992, and amendments thereto.

“Managing agent” means any person who has charge, care, or control of a building or part thereof in which dwelling units or rooming units are leased.

, (12) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-150, s. 1, effective July 1, 2003.

(13)
“Readily accessible substance” means any substance that can be ingested or inhaled by a child less than six years of age or by a pregnant woman. Readily accessible substances include deteriorated paint that is
peeling, chipping, cracking, flaking, or blistering to the extent that the paint has separated from the substrate. Readily accessible substances also include soil, water, toys, vinyl miniblinds, bathtubs, lavatories, doors,
door jambs, stairs, stair rails, windows, interior windowsills, baseboards, and paint that is chalking.

(14)
“Regularly visits” means the presence at a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility on at least two different days within any week, provided that each day’s visit lasts at least three hours and the combined
weekly visits last at least six hours, and the combined annual visits last at least 60 hours.

(15)
“Remediation” means the elimination or control of lead poisoning hazards by methods approved by the Department.

(16)
“Residential housing unit” means a dwelling, dwelling unit, or other structure, all or part of which is designed or used for human habitation, including the common areas, the grounds, any outbuildings, or other
structures appurtenant to the residential housing unit.

(17)
“Supplemental address” means a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility where a child with confirmed lead poisoning regularly visits or attends. Supplemental address also means a residential housing
unit or child-occupied facility where a child resided, regularly visited, or attended within the six months immediately preceding the determination of confirmed lead poisoning.

History.
1997-443, ss. 11A.123, 15.30(b); 1998-209, s. 2; 2003-150, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-57, s. 11E.6(b).

§ 130A-131.7.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

“Abatement” means undertaking any of the following measures to eliminate a lead-based paint hazard:

Removing lead-based paint from a surface and repainting the surface.

Removing a component, such as a windowsill, painted with lead-based paint and replacing the component.

Enclosing a surface painted with lead-based paint with paneling, vinyl siding, or another approved material.

Encapsulating a surface painted with lead-based paint with a sealant.

Any other measure approved by the Commission.

“Child-occupied facility” means a building, or portion of a building, constructed before 1978, regularly visited by a child who is less than six years of age. Child-occupied facilities may include, but are not limited to, child care facilities, preschools,
nurseries, kindergarten classrooms, schools, clinics, or treatment centers including the common areas, the grounds, any outbuildings, or other structures appurtenant to the facility.

“Confirmed lead poisoning” means a blood lead concentration of 10 micrograms per deciliter or greater determined by the lower of two consecutive blood tests within a 12-month period.

“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality or its authorized agent.

“Elevated blood lead level” means a blood lead concentration of five micrograms per deciliter or greater determined by the lower of two consecutive blood tests within a 12-month period.

“Lead-based paint hazard” means a condition that is likely to result in exposure to lead-based paint or to soil or dust that contains lead at a concentration that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard.

“Lead poisoning hazard” means any of the following:

Any lead-based paint or other substance that contains lead in an amount equal to or greater than 1.0 milligrams lead per square centimeter as determined by X-ray fluorescence or five-tenths of a percent (0.5%) lead by weight as determined by chemical
analysis: (i) on any readily accessible substance or chewable surface on which there is evidence of teeth marks or mouthing; or (ii) on any other deteriorated or otherwise damaged interior or exterior surface.

Any substance that contains lead intended for use by children less than six years of age in an amount equal to or greater than 0.06 percent (0.06%) lead by weight as determined by chemical analysis.

Any concentration of lead dust that is equal to or greater than 40 micrograms per square foot on floors or 250 micrograms per square foot on interior windowsills, vinyl miniblinds, bathtubs, kitchen sinks, or lavatories.

Any lead-based paint or other substance that contains lead on a friction or impact surface that is subject to abrasion, rubbing, binding, or damage by repeated contact and where the lead dust concentrations on the nearest horizontal surface underneath
the friction or impact surface are equal to or greater than 40 micrograms per square foot on floors or 250 micrograms per square foot on interior windowsills.

Any concentration of lead in bare soil in play areas, gardens, pet sleeping areas, and areas within three feet of a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility equal to or greater than 400 parts per million. Any concentration of lead in bare soil
in other locations of the yard equal to or greater than 1,200 parts per million.

Any ceramic ware generating equal to or greater than three micrograms of lead per milliliter of leaching solution for flatware or 0.5 micrograms of lead per milliliter for cups, mugs, and pitchers as determined by Method 973.32 of the Association of Official
Analytical Chemists.

Any concentration of lead in drinking water equal to or greater than 10 parts per billion.

“Lead-safe housing” is housing that was built since 1978 or has been tested by a person that has been certified to perform risk assessments and found to have no lead-based paint hazard within the meaning of the Residential Lead-Based Paint Reduction Act
of 1992, 42 U.S.C. § 4851b(15).

“Maintenance standard” means the following:

Using safe work practices, repairing and repainting areas of deteriorated paint inside a residential housing unit and for single-family and duplex residential dwelling built before 1950, repairing and repainting areas of deteriorated paint on interior
and exterior surfaces;

Cleaning the interior of the unit to remove dust that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard;

Adjusting doors and windows to minimize friction or impact on surfaces;

Subject to the occupant’s approval, appropriately cleaning any carpets;

Taking such steps as are necessary to ensure that all interior surfaces on which dust might collect are readily cleanable; and

Providing the occupant or occupants all information required to be provided under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction Act of 1992, and amendments thereto.

“Managing agent” means any person who has charge, care, or control of a building or part thereof in which dwelling units or rooming units are leased.

, (12) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-150, s. 1, effective July 1, 2003.

(13)
“Readily accessible substance” means any substance that can be ingested or inhaled by a child less than six years of age or by a pregnant woman. Readily accessible substances include deteriorated paint that is
peeling, chipping, cracking, flaking, or blistering to the extent that the paint has separated from the substrate. Readily accessible substances also include soil, water, toys, vinyl miniblinds, bathtubs, lavatories, doors,
door jambs, stairs, stair rails, windows, interior windowsills, baseboards, and paint that is chalking.

(14)
“Regularly visits” means the presence at a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility on at least two different days within any week, provided that each day’s visit lasts at least three hours and the combined
weekly visits last at least six hours, and the combined annual visits last at least 60 hours.

(15)
“Remediation” means the elimination or control of lead poisoning hazards by methods approved by the Department.

(16)
“Residential housing unit” means a dwelling, dwelling unit, or other structure, all or part of which is designed or used for human habitation, including the common areas, the grounds, any outbuildings, or other
structures appurtenant to the residential housing unit.

(17)
“Supplemental address” means a residential housing unit or child-occupied facility where a child with confirmed lead poisoning regularly visits or attends. Supplemental address also means a residential housing
unit or child-occupied facility where a child resided, regularly visited, or attended within the six months immediately preceding the determination of confirmed lead poisoning.

History.
1997-443, ss. 11A.123, 15.30(b); 1998-209, s. 2; 2003-150, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-57, s. 11E.6(b); 2021-69, s. 1.

§ 130A-131.8.
Laboratory reports.

All laboratories doing business in this State shall report to the Department all environmental lead test results and blood lead test results for children less than six years of age and for individuals whose ages are unknown at the time of testing. Reports
shall be made by electronic submission within five working days after test completion.

Reports of blood lead test results shall contain all of the following:

The child’s full name, date of birth, sex, race, ethnicity, address, and Medicaid number, if any.

The name, address, and telephone number of the requesting health care provider.

The name, address, and telephone number of the testing laboratory.

The laboratory results, whether the specimen type is venous or capillary; the laboratory sample number, and the dates the sample was collected and analyzed.

Reports of environmental lead test results shall contain all of the following:

The address where the samples were collected.

Sample type, such as dust, paint, soil, or water.

Surface type, such as floor, window sill, or window trough.

Collection location.

The name, address, and telephone number of the testing laboratory.

The laboratory results, unit of measurement, the laboratory sample number, and the dates the sample was collected and analyzed.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 2003-150, s. 2; 2009-484, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-484, s. 1, effective August 26, 2009, rewrote the section.

§ 130A-131.9.
Examination and testing.

When the Department has a reasonable suspicion that a child less than six years of age has an elevated blood lead level or a confirmed lead poisoning, the Department may require that child to be examined and tested within 30 days. The Department shall
require from the owner, managing agent, or tenant of the residential housing unit or child-occupied facility information on each child who resides in, regularly visits, or attends, or, who has within the past six months, resided in,
regularly visited, or attended the unit or facility. The information required shall include each child’s name and date of birth, the names and addresses of each child’s parents, legal guardian, or full-time custodian. The owner, managing
agent, or tenant shall submit the required information within 10 days of receipt of the request from the Department.

History.
1997-443, s. 15.30(b); 2003-150, s. 3.